Hawaii statutes.
§128D-2.6 Ecological risk assessor.
The department may establish a permanent exempt position for an ecological risk
assessor for the purpose of assessing ecological risks and damages. The
position shall be appointed by the director without regard to chapter 76. [L
1999, c 211, §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2015, c 185, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next